Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 2. Department of Environmental Conservation.

Collateral references. —

61B Am. Jur. 2d, Pollution Control, § 4.

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, § 98 et seq.

Constitutionality of reforestation or forest conservation legislation. 13 ALR2d 1095.

Right to maintain action to enjoin public nuisance as affected by existence of pollution control agency. 60 ALR3d 665.

Sec. 46.03.020.
Powers of the department.

The department may

enter into contracts and compliance agreements necessary or convenient to carry out the functions, powers, and duties of the department;

review and appraise programs and activities of state departments and agencies in light of the policy set out in AS

46.03.010

for the purpose of determining the extent to which the programs and activities are contributing to the achievement of that policy and to make recommendations to the departments and agencies, including environmental guidelines;

consult with and cooperate with

officials and representatives of any nonprofit corporation or organization in the state;

persons, organizations, and groups, public and private, using, served by, interested in, or concerned with the environment of the state;

appear and participate in proceedings before any state or federal regulatory agency involving or affecting the purposes of the department;

undertake studies, inquiries, surveys, or analyses it may consider essential to the accomplishment of the purposes of the department; these activities may be carried out by the personnel of the department or in cooperation with public or private agencies, including educational, civic, and research organizations, colleges, universities, institutes, and foundations;

at reasonable times, enter and inspect with the consent of the owner or occupier any property or premises to investigate either actual or suspected sources of pollution or contamination or to ascertain compliance or noncompliance with a regulation that may be adopted under AS

46.03.020

—

46.03.040

; information relating to secret processes or methods of manufacture discovered during investigation is confidential;

conduct investigations and hold hearings and compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of accounts, books, and documents by the issuance of a subpoena;

advise and cooperate with municipal, regional, and other local agencies and officials in the state, to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

act as the official agency of the state in all matters affecting the purposes of the department under federal laws now or hereafter enacted;

adopt regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including regulations providing for

control, prevention, and abatement of air, water, or land or subsurface land pollution;

safeguard standards for petroleum and natural gas pipeline construction, operation, modification, or alteration;

protection of public water supplies by establishing minimum drinking water standards, and standards for the construction, improvement, and maintenance of public water supply systems;

collection and disposal of sewage and industrial waste;

collection and disposal of garbage, refuse, and other discarded solid materials from industrial, commercial, agricultural, and community activities or operations;

control of pesticides;

other purposes as may be required for the implementation of the policy declared in AS

46.03.010

;

handling, transportation, treatment, storage, and disposal of hazardous wastes;

inspect the premises of sellers and suppliers of paint, vessels, and marine and boating supplies, and take other actions necessary to enforce AS

46.03.715

;

notwithstanding any other provision of law, take all actions necessary to receive authorization from the administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency to administer and enforce a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System program in accordance with 33 U.S.C. 1342 (sec. 402, Clean Water Act), 33 U.S.C. 1345 (sec. 405, Clean Water Act), 40 C.F.R. Part 123, and 40 C.F.R. Part 403, as amended;

require the owner or operator of a facility to undertake monitoring, sampling, and reporting activities described in 33 U.S.C. 1318 (sec. 308, Clean Water Act);

notwithstanding any other provision of law, take all actions necessary to receive federal authorization of a state program for the department and the Department of Natural Resources to administer and enforce a dredge and fill permitting program allowed under 33 U.S.C. 1344 (sec. 404, Clean Water Act) and to implement the program, if authorized.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 220 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 60 SLA 1977; am § 12 ch 172 SLA 1978; am § 8 ch 93 SLA 1981; am § 86 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 67 SLA 1987; am § 92 ch 36 SLA 1990; am § 30 ch 126 SLA 1994; am § 2 ch 94 SLA 1998; am § 4 ch 23 SLA 2003; am § 3 ch 143 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 95 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 17 SLA 2008; am § 3 ch 12 SLA 2013; am § 53 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Cross references. —

For status of certain enforcement and inspection employees of the department as peace officers, see AS

46.03.890(b)

. For provisions relating to coordination of environmental permits and procedures, see AS

46.35.300

; for fees for department services, see AS

44.46.025

.

For findings related to (14) of this section, see sec. 1, ch. 12, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

For duties of the department and the Department of Natural Resources relating to assuming primacy of the dredge and fill permitting program allowed under 33 U.S.C. 1344 (sec. 404, Clean Water Act), see sec. 4, ch. 12, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For coverage of chapter, see 18 AAC 15, art. 1.

For permit procedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 2.

For adoption of npdes permits, see 18 AAC 15, art. 3.

For certification, see 18 AAC 15, art. 4.

For informal and fee review procedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 5.

For administrative appeal proceedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 6.

For ambient air quality management, see 18 AAC 50, art. 1.

For program administration, see 18 AAC 50, art. 2.

For major stationary source permits, see 18 AAC 50, art. 3.

For user fees, see 18 AAC 50, art. 4.

For conformity, see 18 AAC 50, art. 7.

For emissions inspection and maintenance requirements, see 18 AAC 52, art. 1.

For certification requirements, see 18 AAC 52, art. 4.

For certified station requirements, see 18 AAC 52, art. 5.

For oxygenated gasoline requirements, see 18 AAC 53, art. 1.

For waste disposal permit, see 18 AAC 60, art. 2.

For municipal solid waste landfills, see 18 AAC 60, art. 3.

For monofills, see 18 AAC 60, art. 4.

For land application of biosolids, see 18 AAC 60, art. 5.

For reserved, see 18 AAC 60, art. 6.

For monitoring and corrective action requirements, see 18 AAC 60, art. 7.

For identification of hazardous waste, see 18 AAC 62, art. 1.

For standards applicable to a generator, see 18 AAC 62, art. 2.

For standards applicable to a transporter, see 18 AAC 62, art. 3.

For treatment, storage, and disposal, see 18 AAC 62, art. 4.

For standards applicable to specific hazardous wastes and facilities, see 18 AAC 62, art. 5.

For land disposal restrictions, see 18 AAC 62, art. 6.

For hazardous waste facility permit, see 18 AAC 62, art. 7.

For applicability and basic requirements, see 18 AAC 63, art. 1.

For requirements for hazardous waste or PCB incinerators, hazardous waste land facilities, chemical waste landfills, and hazardous waste underground injection wells, see 18 AAC 63, art. 2.

For review criteria, see 18 AAC 63, art. 3.

For litter receptacles, see 18 AAC 64.

For litter reduction and resource recovery grants, see 18 AAC 65.

For waste reduction and recycling awards for schools, see 18 AAC 66.

For commercial passenger vessel environmental compliance program, see 18 AAC 69.

For statewide standards, see 18 AAC 70, art. 1.

For exceptions to statewide standards, see 18 AAC 70, art. 2.

For placer mining demonstration grants, see 18 AAC 71.

For domestic wastewater treatment and disposal, see 18 AAC 72, art. 1.

For domestic wastewater system plan review, see 18 AAC 72, art. 2.

For certified installer program, see 18 AAC 72, art. 4.

For nondomestic wastewater, see 18 AAC 72, art. 5.

For nondomestic wastewater system plan review, see 18 AAC 72, art. 6.

For construction grants, see 18 AAC 73.

For oil pollution prevention requirements, see 18 AAC 75, art. 1.

For financial responsibility for oil discharges, see 18 AAC 75, art. 2.

For discharge reporting, cleanup, and disposal of oil and other hazardous substances, see 18 AAC 75, art. 3.

For oil discharge prevention and contingency plans and nontank vessel plans, see 18 AAC 75, art. 4.

For oil spill primary response action contractors and nontank vessel cleanup contractors, incident management teams, and response planning facilitators, see 18 AAC 75, art. 5.

For civil penalties for discharge of petroleum and petroleum products and byproducts, see 18 AAC 75, art. 6.

For surface oiling, see 18 AAC 75, art. 7.

For oil discharge for scientific purposes, see 18 AAC 75, art. 8.

For Alaska clean water fund, see 18 AAC 76, art. 1.

For Alaska drinking water fund, see 18 AAC 76, art. 2.

For underground storage tanks, see 18 AAC 78, art. 1.

For corrective action for leaking underground storage tanks, see 18 AAC 78, art. 2.

For certification of underground storage tank workers, see 18 AAC 78, art. 4.

For storage tank assistance fund, see 18 AAC 78, art. 5.

For cleanup levels, see 18 AAC 78, art. 6.

For underground storage tank laboratory approval, see 18 AAC 78, art. 8.

For public water system review and approval requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 2.

For standards, monitoring, variances, and exemptions, see 18 AAC 80, art. 3.

For coliform bacteria requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 4.

For lead and copper requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 5.

For surface water treatment, see 18 AAC 80, art. 6.

For enhanced surface water treatment, see 18 AAC 80, art. 7.

For disinfection and disinfection by-products, see 18 AAC 80, art. 9.

For public notification requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 10.

For laboratory certification requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 11.

For administrative penalties, see 18 AAC 80, art. 12.

For purpose, applicability, and term, see 18 AAC 83, art. 1.

For permit process, see 18 AAC 83, art. 2.

For permit application requirements, see 18 AAC 83, art. 4.

For permit conditions — general, see 18 AAC 83, art. 5.

For requirements and permit conditions specific to type of discharge, see 18 AAC 83, art. 6.

For registration of ionizing radiation sources, see 18 AAC 85, art. 1.

For use of x-rays in the healing arts, see 18 AAC 85, art. 3.

For use of sealed radioactive sources in the healing arts, see 18 AAC 85, art. 4.

For industrial radiography protection requirements, see 18 AAC 85, art. 5.

For microwave radiation protection limits, see 18 AAC 85, art. 6.

For laser protection standards, see 18 AAC 85, art. 7.

For purpose, applicability, prohibitions, and discharge notification, see 18 AAC 90, art. 1.

For pesticide registration, see 18 AAC 90, art. 2.

For certification requirements, see 18 AAC 90, art. 3.

For recordkeeping requirements, see 18 AAC 90, art. 4.

For permit requirements, see 18 AAC 90, art. 5.

For pesticide handling requirements, see 18 AAC 90, art. 6.

For inspection and enforcement, see 18 AAC 90, art. 7.

For forestry vegetation management, see 18 AAC 90, art. 8.

For compliance orders, see 18 AAC 95, art. 1.

For definitions, see 18 AAC 95, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective May 22, 2013, added (14), and made a related change.

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, in the introductory language of (10), deleted “, by way of example and not limitation” preceding “regulations providing for”.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 143, SLA 2004 (HB 546), amending this system to authorize the state to administer National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System (NPDES) permits for the timber industry, see 2004 House Journal 3084 — 3085.

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 95, SLA 2005 (SB 110), proposing state administration and enforcement of the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System, as authorized by the 2005 amendment of paragraph (12) of this section, see 2005 Senate Journal 319 — 321.

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 12, SLA 2013 (SB 27), see 2013 Senate Journal 60 — 61.

Sec. 46.03.022.
Dental radiological equipment.

This title does not authorize the department to register, inspect, test, or otherwise regulate dental radiological equipment or records relating to dental radiological equipment regulated by the Board of Dental Examiners under AS

08.36.075

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 79 SLA 1998)

Sec. 46.03.024.
Consideration in adopting pollution regulations.

Notwithstanding another provision of law to the contrary, when adopting a regulation relating to the control, prevention, and abatement of air, water, or land or subsurface land pollution, the department shall give special attention to public comments concerning the cost of compliance with the regulation and to alternate practical methods of complying with the statute being interpreted or implemented by the regulation.

History.

(§ 10 ch 64 SLA 1995)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 46.03.020(b). Renumbered in 1995.

Sec. 46.03.025.
Accounting and disposition of fees. [Repealed, § 92 ch 36 SLA 1990. For current provisions, see AS 37.05.142 — 37.05.146.]

Sec. 46.03.030.
Water quality enhancement, water supply, sewage, and solid waste facilities grants.

[Repealed, § 19 ch 220 SLA 1976.]

The department may grant to a municipality, as funds are available, a grant for any of the following:

a water quality enhancement project;

a public water supply, treatment, or distribution system;

a wastewater collection, treatment, or discharge system;

a solid waste processing, disposal, or resource recovery system.

There is a water quality enhancement and water supply, wastewater, and solid waste systems program created in the department to carry out the purposes of this section.

The department shall, by regulation, identify those costs that are eligible costs for the purposes of this section. Eligible costs do not include interest and financing and right-of-way acquisition, or costs that are related to the operation, maintenance, or repair of a system.

A grant under this section to a municipality for a project funded by an appropriation made by the legislature

before July 1, 1994, may not exceed 50 percent of the eligible costs of the project;

after July 1, 1994, may not exceed

85 percent of the eligible costs for a municipality with a population of 1,000 persons or less;

70 percent of the eligible costs for a municipality with a population of 1,001 to 10,000 persons; and

60 percent of the eligible costs for a municipality with a population greater than 10,000 persons.

[Repealed, § 14 ch 106 SLA 1994.]

The match required for grants made under this section may include

federal funds; or

state funds, other than those funds received under this section or AS 37.06.

Construction of a project for which a grant is made under this section may commence only after the department has approved in writing the plans and specifications for the project.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971; am §§ 2, 19 ch 220 SLA 1976; am §§ 30, 31 ch 168 SLA 1978; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 163 SLA 1980; am §§ 1, 2 ch 90 SLA 1986; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 40 SLA 1987; am §§ 1 — 5, 14 ch 106 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 44 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For construction grants, see 18 AAC 73.

For oil spill primary response action contractors and nontank vessel cleanup contractors, incident management teams, and response planning facilitators, see 18 AAC 75, art. 5.

Sec. 46.03.032.
Alaska clean water fund.

There is established as a separate fund the Alaska clean water fund, which is distinct from any other money or fund in the treasury, and which consists of money appropriated by the legislature to meet federal matching requirements, federal capitalization grants, loan repayments, interest received from loan repayments, interest received from investment of money in the Alaska clean water fund, and the proceeds and accrued interest received from the sale of revenue bonds issued under AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

and secured by the Alaska clean water fund. Separate accounts may be created in the Alaska clean water fund. The accounts may be combined for purposes of investment.

The provisions of this section shall be liberally construed in order to carry out the purposes for which they were enacted. The department shall administer the Alaska clean water fund consistent with the requirements of this section and AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

.

The department may accept and make use of all capitalization grants provided by the federal government under 33 U.S.C. 1251 — 1387 (the federal Clean Water Act), as amended.

Except as otherwise limited by federal law, the Alaska clean water fund may be used

for the following categories of projects:

planning, designing, building, constructing, and rehabilitating a public wastewater collection, treatment, or discharge system;

implementing a management program for controlling water pollution from nonpoint sources under 33 U.S.C. 1329, including planning, designing, building, constructing, and rehabilitating a solid waste management system; and

developing and implementing an estuary conservation and management program under 33 U.S.C. 1330;

to provide the following types of financial assistance for the categories of projects listed in (1) of this subsection:

making loans to municipalities and other qualified entities;

buying or refinancing the debt obligations of a municipality or other qualified entity;

providing collateral security for or purchasing insurance for a municipal, state agency, or other qualified entity debt obligation; and

to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on revenue bonds issued by the state and to pay the costs of issuance and administration of the bonds, so long as the proceeds of the bond sale are deposited in the Alaska clean water fund.

Repayment of loans shall be secured in a manner that the department determines is feasible to assure prompt repayment under a loan agreement entered into with the borrower.

The department

may spend money from the Alaska clean water fund to pay the costs of

administering the fund; and

the department in conducting activities under this section and AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

, including the costs of issuance and administration as defined in AS

37.15.605

;

shall spend money from the Alaska clean water fund to pay

into the bond redemption fund (AS

37.15.565

), and into any other bond redemption fund or account created by a relevant bond resolution, the amount certified by the state bond committee under AS

37.15.585

; and

the costs of the state bond committee in conducting activities under this section and AS

37.15.560

— 37.15.605, including the costs of issuance and administration as defined in AS 37.15.605.

A municipality or other qualified entity wishing to borrow money from the Alaska clean water fund shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that it

has sufficient legal authority to incur the debt for which it is applying; and

will establish and maintain a dedicated source of revenue or other acceptable revenue source for repayment of the loan and sufficient reserves for the loan as may be necessary.

Allocation of Alaska clean water fund loans shall be made in accordance with the priority list developed by the department, using criteria specified in regulations adopted by the department.

Before making a loan from the Alaska clean water fund, the department shall, by regulation, specify

standards for the eligibility of borrowers and the type of projects to be financed with loans;

loan term and interest rate policies for loans made from the fund;

standards regarding the technical and economic viability and revenue self-sufficiency of eligible projects;

collateral or other security required for loans;

terms of loans; and

other relevant criteria, standards, or procedures.

Except as necessary to comply with the covenants of a bond resolution under AS

37.15.573

, a loan made by the department shall be made according to the standards, criteria, and procedures established by regulations under this section. A loan made from the Alaska clean water fund may be subject to the state aid intercept provisions of AS

37.15.575

. Except as necessary to comply with the covenants of a bond resolution under AS

37.15.573

, in making a loan from the Alaska clean water fund for a solid waste management system, the department shall give priority to a project that will alleviate severe health or environmental concerns in the community or region proposing the system. In addition, the department may consider

the extent of local or regional support for the proposed system; and

the extent to which the applicant can demonstrate that the full range of solid waste management options has been reasonably considered and that the proposed system is consistent with the promotion of the solid and hazardous waste management practices established in AS

46.06.021

.

The department shall prepare reports required by the federal government in conjunction with federal capitalization grant award conditions. The department shall also prepare reports and notices, including notices of default, required by the state bond committee in conjunction with bonds issued under AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

. The department shall also prepare a biennial report on the Alaska clean water fund and notify the legislature that it is available on or before the first day of each first regular session of the legislature.

Loan repayments and interest earned by loans from the Alaska clean water fund shall be deposited in the Alaska clean water fund.

Annual principal payments shall commence within one year after project completion.

[Repealed, § 14 ch 106 SLA 1994.]

Regulations adopted by the department under this section that would affect issuance or repayment of revenue bonds under AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

may not be inconsistent with those statutes or with regulations adopted by the state bond committee under those statutes. To the extent that regulations adopted by the department are inconsistent with AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

, with regulations adopted by the state bond committee under those statutes, or with the covenants of a bond resolution adopted under AS

37.15.573

, the provisions of AS 37.15.560 — 37.15.605, the regulations adopted under those statutes, and the covenants of the bond resolution govern.

In this section,

“other qualified entity” means

an intermunicipal or interstate agency as those terms are used in 33 U.S.C. 1383, and may include an authority, corporation, instrumentality, enterprise, or other entity formed through an agreement between a municipality and one or more other governmental entities under AS

29.35.010

(13) or under art. X, sec. 13, Constitution of the State of Alaska, or between a municipality and a regional housing authority under AS

18.55.996(b)

; or

an organization that is eligible for assistance under 33 U.S.C. 1383, that is not exempted from regulation under AS

42.05.711(d)

, that provides wastewater service under a certificate of convenience and necessity from the former Alaska Public Utilities Commission or the Regulatory Commission of Alaska, and that is economically regulated by the Regulatory Commission of Alaska;

“solid waste management system” includes capital improvements and equipment used for the purpose of solid and hazardous waste source reduction, recycling, treatment, or disposal.

History.

(§ 4 ch 40 SLA 1987; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 174 SLA 1990; am § 23 ch 90 SLA 1991; am §§ 6 — 10, 14 ch 106 SLA 1994; am § 31 ch 126 SLA 1994; am § 103 ch 21 SLA 1995; am §§ 3 — 12 ch 141 SLA 1996; am § 18 ch 61 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (o) was enacted as (p); relettered in 1996, at which time former subsection (o) was relettered as (p).

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska clean water fund, see 18 AAC 76, art. 1.

Sec. 46.03.034.
Alaska clean water administrative fund.

The Alaska clean water administrative fund is established as a separate fund that is distinct from other money or funds in the treasury. The fund is composed of two accounts, the

Alaska clean water administrative operating account; and

Alaska clean water administrative income account.

The legislature may appropriate to the Alaska clean water administrative operating account the annual balance of the Alaska clean water administrative income account.

The department shall administer the Alaska clean water administrative fund.

The Alaska clean water administrative operating account may be used to pay for the department’s operational and administrative costs necessary to manage the Alaska clean water fund and the Alaska clean water administrative fund and for such other purposes permitted by federal law.

Money received in payment of fees charged by the department under the authority of AS

46.03.035

and earnings on the Alaska clean water administrative fund shall be deposited in the Alaska clean water administrative income account.

History.

(§ 11 ch 106 SLA 1994; am § 19 ch 61 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska clean water fund, see 18 AAC 76, art. 1.

Sec. 46.03.035.
Fees charged for loans made from the Alaska clean water fund.

The department may charge and collect reasonable fees in connection with making and servicing loans made by the department under the authority of AS

46.03.032

. The department shall by regulation specify the rates and amounts of the fees.

History.

(§ 20 ch 61 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska clean water fund, see 18 AAC 76, art. 1.

Sec. 46.03.036.
Alaska drinking water fund.

The Alaska drinking water fund is established as a separate fund that is distinct from other money or funds in the treasury. The fund shall be administered by the department. The Alaska drinking water fund consists of the following items, all of which shall be deposited into the fund upon receipt:

the proceeds and accrued interest received from the sale of revenue bonds issued under AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

and secured by the Alaska drinking water fund;

money appropriated by the legislature, including federal capitalization grants;

loan repayments; and

interest received from loan repayments and interest received from investment of money in the Alaska drinking water fund.

Except as otherwise limited by federal law, the department may use money in the Alaska drinking water fund to

provide financial assistance for drinking water system projects, including projects to plan, design, build, construct, or rehabilitate a public drinking water collection, storage, treatment, or distribution system, to

municipalities;

organizations that are not exempted from regulation under AS

42.05.711(d)

, that provide water service under a certificate of convenience and necessity from the former Alaska Public Utilities Commission or the Regulatory Commission of Alaska, and that are economically regulated by the Regulatory Commission of Alaska;

earn interest on the amounts deposited in the fund;

pay the costs of administering the fund and conducting activities under this section and AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

, including the costs of issuance and administration as defined in AS

37.15.605

;

pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on revenue bonds issued by the state and to pay the costs of issuance and administration of the bonds, so long as the proceeds of the bond sale are deposited in the Alaska drinking water fund;

pay

into the bond redemption fund (AS

37.15.565

), and into any other bond redemption fund or account created by a relevant bond resolution, the amount certified by the state bond committee under AS

37.15.585

; and

the costs of the state bond committee in conducting activities under this section and AS

37.15.560

— 37.15.605, including the costs of issuance and administration as defined in AS 37.15.605.

Repayment of loans shall be secured in a manner that the department determines is feasible to ensure prompt repayment under a loan agreement entered into with the borrower.

Separate accounts may be created in the Alaska drinking water fund. The accounts may be combined for purposes of investment.

The department may adopt regulations necessary to implement the Alaska drinking water fund in a manner consistent with federal law. The regulations adopted by the department under (h) of this section may establish different loan terms, charges, rates, and standards for different classes of borrowers to accommodate the different levels of risk and costs that the different classes may present.

An organization that qualifies for financial assistance under (b)(1)(B) of this section or a municipality wishing to borrow money from the Alaska drinking water fund shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that it

has sufficient legal authority to incur the debt for which it is applying; and

will establish and maintain a dedicated source of revenue or other acceptable revenue source for repayment of the loan and sufficient reserves for the loan as may be necessary.

Allocation of Alaska drinking water fund loans shall be made in accordance with a priority list developed by the department, using criteria specified in regulations adopted by the department. A loan may not be made to an organization that is not a municipality to refinance debt of that organization.

Before making a loan from the Alaska drinking water fund, the department shall, by regulation, specify

standards for the eligibility of borrowers and the type of projects to be financed with loans;

loan term and interest rate policies for loans made from the fund;

standards regarding the technical and economic viability and revenue of self-sufficiency of eligible projects;

collateral or other security required for loans;

terms of loans; and

other relevant standards or procedures.

Except as necessary to comply with the covenants of a bond resolution under AS

37.15.573

, a loan made by the department shall be made according to the standards and procedures established by regulations under this section. A loan made from the Alaska drinking water fund may be subject to the state aid intercept provisions of AS

37.15.575

.

The department shall also prepare reports and notices, including notices of default, required by the state bond committee in conjunction with bonds issued under AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

.

Regulations adopted by the department under this section that would affect issuance or repayment of revenue bonds under AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

may not be inconsistent with those statutes or with regulations adopted by the state bond committee under those statutes. To the extent that regulations adopted by the department are inconsistent with AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

, with regulations adopted by the state bond committee under those statutes, or with the covenants of a bond resolution adopted under AS

37.15.573

, the provisions of AS 37.15.560 — 37.15.605, the regulations adopted under those statutes, and the covenants of the bond resolution govern.

History.

(§ 12 ch 106 SLA 1994; am § 21 ch 61 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska drinking water fund, see 18 AAC 76, art. 2.

Sec. 46.03.038.
Alaska drinking water administrative fund.

The Alaska drinking water administrative fund is established as a separate fund that is distinct from other money or funds in the state treasury. The fund is composed of two accounts, the

Alaska drinking water administrative operating account; and

Alaska drinking water administrative income account.

The legislature may appropriate to the Alaska drinking water administrative operating account the annual balance of the Alaska drinking water administrative income account.

The department shall administer the Alaska drinking water administrative fund.

The Alaska drinking water administrative operating account may be used to pay for the department’s operational and administrative costs necessary to manage the Alaska drinking water fund and the Alaska drinking water administrative fund and for such other purposes permitted by federal law.

Money received in payment of fees charged by the department under the authority of AS

46.03.039

and earnings on the Alaska drinking water administrative fund shall be deposited in the Alaska drinking water administrative income account.

History.

(§ 13 ch 106 SLA 1994; am § 22 ch 61 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska drinking water fund, see 18 AAC 76, art. 2.

Sec. 46.03.039.
Fees charged for loans made from the Alaska drinking water fund.

The department may charge and collect reasonable fees in connection with making and servicing loans made by the department under the authority of AS

46.03.036

. The department shall by regulation specify the rates and amounts of such fees.

History.

(§ 23 ch 61 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska drinking water fund, see 18 AAC 76, art. 2.

Sec. 46.03.040.
Alaska environmental plan.

The department shall formulate and annually review and revise a statewide environmental plan for the management and protection of the quality of the environment and the natural resources of the state, in furtherance of the legislative policy and purposes expressed in this chapter.

The department shall submit the first plan to the governor on or before January 1, 1972, and thereafter submit periodic revisions of the plan to the governor. The plan is effective upon approval by the governor and shall serve thereafter as a guide to the public, the state government and the political subdivisions of the state in the development of the environment and natural resources of the state.

In formulating the plan and any revisions, the department may consult with persons, organizations, and groups, public or private, interested in or concerned with the environment of the state, and with a department, division, board, commission, or other agency of the state, with a political subdivision, or with any public authority as may be necessary to enable the department to carry out its responsibilities under this section.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971)

Sec. 46.03.045.
Public recognition of pollution prevention efforts.

In addition to the school awards program under AS

46.11.070

, the department may identify, document, and publicly acknowledge exemplary pollution prevention achievements by individuals, businesses, or government agencies in the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 86 SLA 1991)